New Jersey, session 222, S2201.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Corrections shall provide to a female inmate, upon request, a single dosage of Levonorgestrel. b.    An inmate who has requested Levonorgestrel pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be permitted to consult with a licensed physician or other appropriate medical professional. c.     To the extent possible, a generic substitution of Levonorgestrel shall be provided to a female inmate under the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month after enactment.